Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
General Provisions

199.330.
Children not to be willfully exposed or injured. [Repealed.]

199.335.
Specified persons to report child abuse or neglect — Report to law enforcement agency — Search warrant — Protective custody — Immunity from liability. [Repealed.]

199.340.
Employment or exhibition of child; when prohibited. [Repealed.]

199.341.
Interstate Compact on Placement of Children. [Repealed.]

199.343.
Definitions of terms in Interstate Compact. [Repealed.]

199.345.
Financial responsibility for child placed and agreements under Interstate Compact. [Repealed.]

199.347.
Court may place child in foreign state under compact. [Repealed.]

199.350.
Importation of dependent children. [Repealed.]

199.360.
Department of Welfare to enforce law. [Repealed.]

199.370.
Exceptions to regulations on importation. [Repealed.]

199.375.
Voluntary commitment of children to cabinet — Support — Care — Release. [Repealed.]